Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 1 Public Utilities Commission

39-1-1.
Declaration of policy — Purposes.

The general assembly finds and therefore declares that:

The businesses of distributing electrical energy, producing and transporting manufactured and natural gas, operating water works and furnishing supplies of water for domestic, industrial, and commercial use, offering to the public transportation of persons and property, furnishing and servicing telephonic and wireless audio and visual communication systems, and operation of community antenna television systems are affected with a public interest;

Supervision and reasonable regulation by the state of the manner in which the businesses construct their systems and carry on their operations within the state are necessary to protect and promote the convenience, health, comfort, safety, accommodation, and welfare of the people, and are a proper exercise of the police power of the state; and

Preservation of the state’s resources, commerce, and industry requires the assurance of adequate public transportation and communication facilities, water supplies, and an abundance of energy, all supplied to the people with reliability, at economical cost, and with due regard for the preservation and enhancement of the environment, the conservation of natural resources, including scenic, historic, and recreational assets, and the strengthening of long-range, land-use planning.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to provide fair regulation of public utilities and carriers in the interest of the public, to promote availability of adequate, efficient, and economical energy, communication, and transportation services and water supplies to the inhabitants of the state, to provide just and reasonable rates and charges for such services and supplies, without unjust discrimination, undue preferences or advantages, or unfair or destructive competitive practices, and to cooperate with other states and agencies of the federal government in promoting and coordinating efforts to achieve realization of this policy.

To this end, there is hereby vested in the public utilities commission and the division of public utilities and carriers the exclusive power and authority to supervise, regulate, and make orders governing the conduct of companies offering to the public in intrastate commerce energy, communication, and transportation services and water supplies for the purpose of increasing and maintaining the efficiency of the companies, according desirable safeguards and convenience to their employees and to the public, and protecting them and the public against improper and unreasonable rates, tolls, and charges by providing full, fair, and adequate administrative procedures and remedies, and by securing a judicial review to any party aggrieved by such an administrative proceeding or ruling.

The legislature also finds and declares, as of 1996, the following:

That lower retail electricity rates would promote the state’s economy and the health and general welfare of the citizens of Rhode Island;

That current research and experience indicates that greater competition in the electricity industry would result in a decrease in electricity rates over time;

That greater competition in the electricity industry would stimulate economic growth;

That it is in the public interest to promote competition in the electricity industry and to establish performance-based ratemaking for regulated utilities;

That in connection with the transition to a more competitive electric utility industry, public utilities should have a reasonable opportunity to recover transitional costs associated with commitments prudently incurred in the past pursuant to their legal obligations to provide reliable electric service at reasonable costs;

That it shall be the policy of the state to encourage, through all feasible means and measures, states where fossil-fueled, electric-generating units producing air emissions affecting Rhode Island air quality are located to reduce such emissions over time to levels that enable cost-effective attainment of environmental standards within Rhode Island; and

That in a restructured electrical industry the same protections currently afforded to low-income customers shall continue.

The legislature further finds and declares as of 2006:

That prices of energy, including especially fossil-fuels and electricity, are rising faster than the cost of living and are subject to sharp fluctuations, which conditions create hardships for many households, institutions, organizations, and businesses in the state;

That while utility restructuring has brought some benefits, notably in transmission and distribution costs and more efficient use of generating capacities, it has not resulted in competitive markets for residential and small commercial-industrial customers, lower overall prices, or greater diversification of energy resources used for electrical generation;

That the state’s economy and the health and general welfare of the people of Rhode Island benefit when energy supplies are reliable and least-cost; and

That it is a necessary move beyond basic utility restructuring in order to secure for Rhode Island, to the maximum extent reasonably feasible, the benefits of reasonable and stable rates, least-cost procurement, and system reliability that includes energy resource diversification, distributed generation, and load management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 5.

39-1-2.
Definitions.

Terms used in this title shall be construed as follows, unless another meaning is expressed or is clearly apparent from the language or context:

“Administrator” means the administrator of the division of public utilities and carriers.

“Airport” and “landing field” mean and include all airports and landing fields other than those owned by the state.

“Chairperson” means the chairperson of the public utilities commission.

“Charter carrier” means and includes all carriers for hire or compensation within this state not included in the definition of common carrier.

“Commission” means the public utilities commission.

“Commissioner” means a member of the public utilities commission.

“Common carrier,” except when used in chapters 12, 13, and 14 of this title, means and includes all carriers for hire or compensation, including railroads, street railways, express, freight and freight-line companies, dining-car companies, steam boat, motor boat, power boat, hydrofoil, and ferry companies and all other companies operating any agency or facility for public use in the conveyance over fixed routes, or between fixed termini within this state of persons or property by, or by a combination of, land, air, or water.

“Company” means and includes a person, firm, partnership, corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, association, joint-stock association or company, and his, her, its, or their lessees, trustees, or receivers appointed by any court.

“Customer” means a company taking service from an electric distribution company at a single point of delivery or meter location.

“Distribution facility” means plant or equipment used for the distribution of electricity and that is not a transmission facility.

“Division” means the division of public utilities and carriers.

“Electric distribution company” means a company engaging in the distribution of electricity or owning, operating, or controlling distribution facilities and shall be a public utility pursuant to subsection (20) of this section.

“Electric transmission company” means a company engaging in the transmission of electricity or owning, operating, or controlling transmission facilities. An electric transmission company shall not be subject to regulation as a public utility except as specifically provided in the general laws, but shall be regulated by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission and shall provide transmission service to all nonregulated power producers and customers, whether affiliated or not, on comparable, nondiscriminatory prices and terms. Electric transmission companies shall have the power of eminent domain exercisable following a petition to the commission pursuant to §

39-1-31

.

“Liquefied natural gas” means a fluid in the liquid state composed predominantly of methane and that may contain minor quantities of ethane, propane, nitrogen, or other components normally found in natural gas.

“Manufacturing customers” means all customers that have on file with an electric distribution company a valid certificate of exemption from the Rhode Island sales tax indicating the customer’s status as a manufacturer pursuant to §

44-18-30

.

“Motor carriers” means any carrier regulated by the administrator pursuant to chapters 3, 11, 12, 13, and 14 of this title.

“Natural gas” means the combustible, gaseous mixture of low-molecular-weight, paraffin hydrocarbons, generated below the surface of the earth, containing mostly methane and ethane with small amounts of propane, butane, and hydrocarbons, and sometimes nitrogen, carbon dioxide, hydrogen sulfide, and helium.

“Nonprofit housing development corporation” means a nonprofit corporation that has been approved as a 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) corporation by the Internal Revenue Service, and is organized and operated primarily for the purpose of providing housing for low- and moderate-income persons.

“Nonregulated power producer” means a company engaging in the business of producing, manufacturing, generating, buying, aggregating, marketing, or brokering electricity for sale at wholesale or for retail sale to the public; provided however, that companies that negotiate the purchase of electric generation services on behalf of customers and do not engage in the purchase and resale of electric generation services shall be excluded from this definition. A nonregulated power producer shall not be subject to regulation as a public utility except as specifically provided in the general laws.

“Public utility” means and includes every company that is an electric distribution company and every company operating or doing business in intrastate commerce and in this state as a railroad, street railway, common carrier, gas, liquefied natural gas, water, telephone, telegraph, and pipeline company, and every company owning, leasing, maintaining, managing, or controlling any plant or equipment, or any part of any plant or equipment, within this state for manufacturing, producing, transmitting, distributing, delivering, or furnishing natural or manufactured gas, directly or indirectly, to or for the public, or any cars or equipment employed on, or in connection with, any railroad or street railway for public or general use within this state, or any pipes, mains, poles, wires, conduits, fixtures, through, over, across, under, or along any public highways, parkways, or streets, public lands, waters, or parks for the transmission, transportation, or distribution of gas for sale to the public for light, heat, cooling, or power for providing audio or visual telephonic or telegraphic communication service within this state, or any pond, lake, reservoir, stream, well, or distributing plant or system employed for the distribution of water to the consuming public within this state, including the water supply board of the city of Providence; provided, that, except as provided in §

39-16-9

and in P.L. 1933, ch. 2072, as amended, this definition shall not be construed to apply to any public waterworks or water service owned and furnished by any city, town, water district, fire district, or any other municipal or quasi-municipal corporation, excepting the water supply board of the city of Providence, unless any city, town, water district, fire district, municipal or quasi-municipal corporation obtains water from a source owned or leased by the water resources board, either directly or indirectly, or obtains a loan from the board pursuant to the provisions of chapter 15.1 of title 46, or sells water, on a wholesale or retail basis, inside and outside the territorial limits of the city or town, water district, fire district, municipal or quasi-municipal corporation, except, however, that a public waterworks or water service owned and furnished by any city, town, water district, fire district, or any other municipal or quasi-municipal corporation that sells water, on a wholesale or retail basis, inside and outside its territorial limits, shall not be construed as a public utility if it has fewer than one-thousand five hundred (1,500) total customer-service connections and provided outside sales do not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total water service connections or volumetric sales and provided the price charged to outside customers, per unit of water, is not greater than the price charged to inside customers for the same unit of water, nor to the Rhode Island public transit authority, or to the production and/or distribution of steam, heat, or water by the Rhode Island port authority and economic development corporation in the town of North Kingstown; and the term “public utility” shall also mean and include the Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission; and provided that the ownership or operation of a facility by a company that dispenses alternative fuel or energy sources at retail for use as a motor vehicle fuel or energy source, and the dispensing of alternative fuel or energy sources at retail from such a facility, does not make the company a public utility within the meaning of this title solely because of that ownership, operation, or sale; and provided further that this exemption shall not apply to presently regulated public utilities that sell natural gas or are dispensers of other energy sources; and provided further, that the term “public utility” shall not include any company:

Producing or distributing steam or heat from a fossil-fuel-fired cogeneration plant located at the university of Rhode Island South Kingstown, Rhode Island;

Producing and/or distributing thermal energy and/or electricity to a state-owned facility from a plant located on an adjacent site, regardless of whether steam lines cross a public highway; and

Providing wireless service.

“Purchasing cooperatives” shall mean any association of electricity consumers that join for the purpose of negotiating the purchase of power from a nonregulated power producer, provided however, that purchasing cooperatives shall not be required to be legal entities and are prohibited from being engaged in the re-sale of electric power.

“Railroad” means and includes every railroad other than a street railway, by whatsoever power, operated for public use in the conveyance in this state of persons or property for compensation, with all bridges, ferries, tunnels, switches, spurs, tracks, stations, wharves, and terminal facilities of every kind, used, operated, controlled, leased, or owned by or in connection with any railroad.

“Retail access” means the use of transmission and distribution facilities owned by an electric transmission company or an electric distribution company to transport electricity sold by a nonregulated power producer to retail customers pursuant to §

39-1-27.3

.

“Street railway” means and includes every railway by whatsoever power operated or any extension or extensions, branch, or branches thereof, for public use in the conveyance in this state of persons or property for compensation, being mainly upon, along, above, or below any street, avenue, road, highway, bridge, or public place in any city or town, and including all switches, spurs, tracks, rights of trackage, subways, tunnels, stations, terminals, and terminal facilities of every kind, used, operated, controlled, or owned by or in connection with any street railway.

“Transmission facility” means plant or equipment used for the transmission of electricity as determined by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission pursuant to federal law as of the date of the property transfers pursuant to §

39-1-27(c)

.

“Wireless service” means communication services provided over spectrum licensed by or subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Communications Commission.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any provision of the act entitled, “An Act Relating to the Utility Restructuring Act of 1996” (hereinafter “utility restructuring act”), upon request by the affected electric utility, the commission may exempt from the utility restructuring act or any provision(s) thereof, an electric utility that meets the following requirements:

The utility is not selling or distributing electricity outside of the service territory in effect for that utility on the date of passage of the utility restructuring act; and

The number of kilowatt hours sold or distributed annually by the utility to the public is less than five percent (5%) of the total kilowatt hours consumed annually by the state. Provided, however, that nothing contained in this section shall prevent the commission from allowing competition in the generation of electricity in service territories of utilities exempted in whole or in part from the utility restructuring act pursuant to this section, as long as such allowance of competition is conditioned upon payment to the exempted electric utility of a nonbypassable transition charge calculated to recover the elements comparable in nature to the elements in §

39-1-27.4(b)

and (c) taking into consideration any unique circumstances applicable to the exempted electric utility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 2; P.L. 1936 (s.s.), ch. 2438, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 120, 122; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2876, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-2

; P.L. 1967, ch. 156, § 2; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 277, § 11; P.L. 1980, ch. 335, § 6; P.L. 1983, ch. 235, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 421, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 580, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 121, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 135, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 2.

39-1-2.1.
Presumption of in-state use or intrastate commerce upon use or transportation of liquefied natural gas within the state.

Whereas it is in the public interest of the state that the personal safety of its inhabitants and visitors be protected, and that property situated within the borders of the state be safeguarded, and whereas it is well known and accepted that the use, storage, transmission, or transportation of liquefied natural gas involves an opportunity for the cause of personal injury or property damage, the general assembly hereby declares that the reasonable exercise of its police power for the safety and welfare of the inhabitants and visitors of the state and for the protection of property located within the state requires the control and regulation of the use, storage, transmission, and transportation of liquefied natural gas. Accordingly, the use, storage, transmission, or transportation of liquefied natural gas within the state shall raise a presumption that the liquefied natural gas is intended for use or consumption within the state or for transmission or transportation from one place to another within the state; and the general laws of the state applicable to public utilities and carriers and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder shall apply thereto; provided, however, (1) That in the safety and security zone for LNG tankers in transit upon the navigable waterways of the state of Rhode Island, established by the United States Coast Guard by 33 C.F.R. § 165.121, and authorized by the United States Code Title 33 Chapter 25 Section 1225, there shall be no:

LNG ships in transit must maintain an exclusion zone of two (2) miles ahead, one mile behind; five hundred (500) yards on either side, and thirty (30) feet overhead clearance within which there shall be no:

Persons;

Piers, wharves, docks, bulkheads, or similar structures within or contiguous to navigable structures;

Waterfront facilities on land located within the state of Rhode Island;

Flammable materials;

Hunting grounds or areas from which an incendiary device could be launched; or

Welding, torch cutting, or other hotwork within such prescribed safety and security zone.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 565, § 1.

39-1-3.
Commission and division established — Functions of commission — Administrator.

To implement the legislative policy set forth in §

39-1-1

and to serve as the agencies of the state in effectuating the legislative purpose, there are hereby established a public utilities commission and a division of public utilities and carriers. The commission shall serve as a quasi-judicial tribunal with jurisdiction, powers, and duties to implement and enforce the standards of conduct under §

39-1-27.6

and to hold investigations and hearings involving the rates, tariffs, tolls, and charges, and the sufficiency and reasonableness of facilities and accommodations of railroad, gas, electric distribution, water, telephone, telegraph, and pipeline public utilities; the location of railroad depots and stations, and the control of grade crossings; the revocation, suspension, or alteration of certificates issued pursuant to §

39-19-4

; appeals under §

39-1-30

; petitions under §

39-1-31

; and proceedings under §

39-1-32

.

The administrator shall be a person who is not a commissioner and who shall exercise the jurisdiction, supervision, powers, and duties not specifically assigned to the commission, including the execution of all laws relating to public utilities and carriers and all regulations and orders of the commission governing the conduct and charges of public utilities and who shall perform other duties and have powers as are hereinafter set forth. The administrator shall be a person who is appointed by the governor for an initial term of six (6) years. The administrator shall be appointed with the advice and consent of the senate. The director of administration, with the approval of the governor, shall allocate the administrator to one of the grades established by the pay plan for unclassified employees. The public utilities administrator also shall have powers and duties as provided in §

46-15.3-20

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 335, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 188, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-4.
Composition of commission — Terms — Vacancies.

The public utilities commission shall consist of three (3) electors selected with regard to their qualifications and experience in law and government, energy matters, economics and finance, engineering and accounting, and appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The term of each commissioner shall be six (6) years. The director of administration, with the approval of the governor, shall allocate the position of each commissioner to one of the grades established by the pay plan for unclassified employees.

During the month prior to the expiration of the term of a commissioner, the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate shall appoint a commissioner to succeed the commissioner whose term will then next expire, to serve for a term of six (6) years commencing on the first day of March then next following, and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. A commissioner shall be eligible to succeed him or herself. Upon the expiration of the term of the chairperson, the governor may designate any commissioner as chairperson.

A vacancy in the office of a commissioner, other than by expiration, shall be filled in like manner as an original appointment, but only for the unexpired portion of the term. If a vacancy occurs when the senate is not in session, the governor shall appoint a person to fill the vacancy, but only until the senate shall next convene and give its advice and consent to a new appointment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 7, § 12.

39-1-5.
Removal of commissioner from office.

Commissioners may at any time be removed from office by the governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office, but no commissioner shall be removed from office without an opportunity to be heard, publicly before the governor and after being given notice in writing of the charges against him or her. A copy of the charges and a transcript of the record of the hearing shall be filed with the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-6.
Holding over in office.

When the term of office of a commissioner shall expire, and he or she has participated in hearing all or a substantial part of the evidence in a proceeding pending before the commission, he or she shall remain a commissioner for the sole purpose of completing the hearing and deciding the pending matter and signing the findings, orders, and judgments therein. For such services, the commissioner shall be paid reasonable compensation and necessary expenses as fixed by the commission as composed following the expiration of his or her term of office. For this purpose, a proceeding shall be deemed completed when the commission enters its final order therein regardless of whether the order is or may be appealed to the supreme court and the case remanded to the commission for further proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-7.
Powers of commission — Seal.

The commission shall have the powers of a court of record in the determination and adjudication of all matters over which it is given jurisdiction. It may make orders and render judgments and enforce the same by any suitable process issuable by the superior court. The commission shall have an official seal, which shall have engraved thereon the words: “State of Rhode Island. Public Utilities Commission Seal.”

The commission shall have the power to do a complete audit of the books of all public utilities doing business in this state. The audit shall consider the cost of energy acquisition and all other aspects that the commission deems necessary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-4

; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-7

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-8.
Quorum — Meetings.

Two (2) commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business, except as provided in §

39-1-11

. Meetings of the commission may be held at any time or place upon the call of any member, after a reasonable notice by mail or telephone to the other members, and shall be held at such times and places as in the judgment of the commission will best serve the convenience of all parties in interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 95, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 7, § 12.

39-1-9.
Clerk — Oath of office.

The commission shall appoint an employee of the division as its clerk, who shall serve during its pleasure. The commissioners and clerk shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of the duties of their offices and, before entering upon their offices, shall file a certificate of their oaths for record in the office of the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1.

39-1-10.
Powers and duties of clerk.

The clerk shall have the custody of the seal of the commission; have general charge of the office; keep a full record of its proceedings; file and preserve at its office all documents and papers entrusted to his or her care; prepare such papers and notices as may be required of him or her by the commission; and perform such other duties as it may prescribe. The clerk shall have power to issue subpoenas for witnesses and to administer oaths in all cases before the commission or pertaining to the duties of the office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1.

39-1-11.
Proceedings before commission.

The commission shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations governing the procedure to be followed in any matter that may come before it for a hearing, and in the hearing the commission shall not be bound by technical rules of evidence. The commission shall sit as an impartial, independent body, and is charged with the duty of rendering independent decisions affecting the public interest and private rights based upon the law and upon the evidence presented before it by the division and by the parties in interest. The presence of one commissioner shall constitute a quorum at all hearings, provided that the concurrence of a majority of the commission shall be required for the rendering of a decision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 95, § 2.

39-1-12.
Prehearing procedure — Formulating issues — Copies of exhibits.

Prior to the commencement of any formal hearing, the commission may, in its discretion, direct the parties or their attorneys to appear before it for a conference. At or before the conference, the commission may order any party to file a number of copies, as it may specify, of all exhibits it intends to use in the hearing, and the names and addresses of witnesses it intends to produce in its direct case, together with a short statement of the purposes of each exhibit and of the testimony of each witness. After entry of an order, a party shall not be permitted, except in the discretion of the commission, to introduce into evidence, in its direct case, exhibits that are not filed in accordance with the order. At the conference, the commission may designate a date before which it requires any party in interest to specify what items shown by the filed exhibits are conceded, and further proof of conceded items shall not be required. The commission may also require the parties to simplify the issues; to consider admissions of fact and of documents that will avoid unnecessary proof; and to limit the number of expert witnesses. The commission shall enter an order reciting the concessions and agreements made by the parties, and unless modified at the hearing to prevent manifest injustice, the hearing shall be controlled by the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1.

39-1-13.
Subpoena powers of commissioners.

The commissioners are hereby severally authorized and empowered to administer oaths; and the commission, in all cases of every nature pending before it, is hereby authorized and empowered to summon and examine witnesses and to compel the production and examination of papers, books, accounts, documents, records, certificates, and other legal evidence that may be necessary or proper for the determination and decision of any question before or the discharge of any duty required by law of the commission. All subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum shall be signed by the chairperson or by the clerk, and shall be served as subpoenas are served in civil cases in the superior court; and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as are provided for witnesses in civil cases in the superior court. If any person fails to obey the command of the subpoena, without reasonable cause, or if a person in attendance before the commission shall, without reasonable cause, refuse to be sworn, or to be examined, or to answer a legal and pertinent question, any commissioner may apply to any justice of the superior court, upon proof by affidavit of the fact, for a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2) nor more than five (5) days, directing the person to show cause why he or she should not be adjudged in contempt. Upon the return of the order, the justice before whom the matter is brought for a hearing shall examine under oath the person, and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard, and if the justice shall determine that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined, or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or to produce books, accounts, papers, records, and documents material to the issue that he or she was ordered to bring or produce, he or she may forthwith commit the person to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain until he or she submits to do the act that he or she was so required to do, or is discharged according to law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1.

39-1-14.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

39-1-14

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1979, ch. 95, § 1.

39-1-15.
Investigators and examiners.

For effective administration, supervision, and regulation of public utilities, communications carriers, and common or contract carriers, the administrator, at his or her discretion, may designate examiners, investigators, hearing officers, or one or more agents of the division to make investigations and conduct hearings. In conducting investigations and hearings, the administrator and every person designated therefor by him or her shall be vested with all the powers conferred on the chairperson of the commission by §

39-1-13

. Upon completion of his or her investigation and hearing, the person hearing or investigating shall file his or her recommended decision and findings in writing with the administrator; and the decision and findings, when approved by the administrator, shall have the same force and effect as a decision and findings by the administrator. The administrator may, however, at his or her discretion, upon considering the evidence in the matter at issue and the written recommended decision as filed by the hearing officer, agent, examiner, or investigator, decide the matter in hearing or under investigation him or herself, and in such case, the decision of the administrator with his or her findings shall become effective when signed and filed by him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 795, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 253, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 122, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-12

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 90, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-1-15

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 1.

39-1-15.1.
Enforcement powers of inspectors.

Examiners, field investigators, hearing officers, regulatory inspectors, and other employees of the division designated by the administrator with respect to the enforcement of the provisions of chapters 12 through 14.1 inclusive of this title, shall have and exercise, throughout this state, all powers of police officers including the power to arrest, without warrant, any person who violates any provision of the chapters, and the agents may serve all process lawfully issued by the administrator. Whenever a complaint is made of any violation of the provisions of chapters 12 through 14.1 inclusive of this title, by any examiner, field investigator, hearing officer, regulatory inspector, or any other employee of the division, he or she shall not be required to furnish surety for costs or be liable for costs upon any complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 178, § 1.

39-1-15.2.
Enforcement by police departments.

The administrator is hereby authorized to avail himself or herself of state, city, and town police departments as are, or may hereafter be, existing by law, to enforce the provisions of chapters 12 through 14.1 inclusive of this title and the rules, regulations, and orders of the administrator made under the chapters; and the police departments are hereby given the necessary authority and power, in addition to those they now possess, to carry into effect the directions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 178, § 1.

39-1-16.
Depositions.

In any investigation or hearing conducted by virtue of this title, the person designated to conduct the hearing may cause the deposition of witnesses, wherever residing, to be taken in the manner and used for the purposes prescribed by law for taking depositions in civil actions in the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1.

39-1-17.
Consumers’ council participation.

In any inquiry into, or examination of, any matter wherein tariffs, rates, or charges for, or the cost of, or the quality, standard, or extent of, any service or commodities are requested by the division, and in every formal hearing conducted by the division, the consumers’ council shall be deemed to be an interested party for all purposes, and as such, shall receive all notices and may file complaints, institute proceedings, participate as a party in administrative hearings, and institute or participate in any appeal to the supreme court as an aggrieved party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 1.